Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [120B.1251] PARTICIPATION IN DIRECT ADMISSIONS PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Starting in the 2029-2030 school year, a district or charter school high school must participate in the direct admissions program under section 136A.84 unless the school board has adopted a written resolution exempting one or more high schools from participating in the program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $253,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education for the direct admissions program under Minnesota Statutes, section 136A.84. new text end